Maryland, session 2026, SB0602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0602*

SENATE BILL 602
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE ALGORITHMIC ADDICTION FUND.
7–332.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE ALGORITHMIC ADDICTION
FUND.
(B) THERE IS AN ALGORITHMIC ADDICTION FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO RETAIN THE AMOUNT OF
SETTLEMENT REVENUES DEPOSITED TO THE FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (F)(1) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH SHALL ADMINISTER THE
FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:

SENATE BILL 602 3
(1) ALL CIVIL PENALTIES RECEIVED BY THE STATE FROM ANY
SOURCE RESULTING, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, FROM A JUDGMENT AGAINST OR
SETTLEMENT RELATING TO CLAIMS CONCERNING HARM TO CHILDREN FROM THE
USE OF SOCIAL MEDIA AND THE IMPROPER USE OF ALGORITHMS MADE OR
PROSECUTED BY THE STATE TO RECOVER DAMAGES FOR VIOLATIONS OF STATE
LAW;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND; AND
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND.
(G) (1) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO PROVIDE FUNDS FOR:
(I) CONDUCTING A NEEDS ASSESSMENT THROUGHOUT THE
STATE TO DETERMINE WHERE RESOURCES ARE NEEDED AND BEST PRACTICES FOR
ALGORITHMIC ADDICTION PREVENTION, INTERVENTION, AND TREATMENT;
(II) IMPROVING AND STRENGTHENING ACCESS TO SERVICES
PROVEN TO TREAT THE MENTAL AND PHYSICAL HEALTH IMPACTS ASSOCIATED WITH
ALGORITHMIC ADDICTION, INCLUDING DEPRESSION, ANXIETY, EATING DISORDERS,
SUICIDE, AND SLEEP PROBLEMS;
(III) ALGORITHMIC ADDICTION INTERVENTION SERVICES;
(IV) ALGORITHMIC ADDICTION PREVENTION SERVICES,
INCLUDING THE ORGANIZATION OF PRIMARY AND SECONDARY SCHOOL EDUCATION
CAMPAIGNS TO PREVENT ALGORITHMIC ADDICTION AND PROMOTE DIGITAL AND
MEDIA LITERACY, INCLUDING FOR ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES;
(V) RESEARCH AND TRAINING FOR ALGORITHMIC ADDICTION
TREATMENT AND PREVENTION, AND SOCIAL MEDIA AND YOUTH MENTAL HEALTH,
INCLUDING FOR ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES; AND
(VI) SUPPORTING AND EXPANDING OTHER EVIDENCE–BASED
INTERVENTIONS FOR ALGORITHMIC ADDICTION PREVENTION AND TREATMENT.
(2) AFTER SATISFYING THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, ANY UNSPENT FUNDS IN THE FUND MAY BE EXPENDED BY THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH FOR YOUTH MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.

SENATE BILL 602
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(I) (1) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(2) FOR CIVIL PENALTIES RECEIVED BY THE STATE FROM ANY
SOURCE RESULTING, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, FROM A JUDGMENT AGAINST OR
SETTLEMENT RELATING TO CLAIMS CONCERNING HARM TO CHILDREN FROM THE
USE OF SOCIAL MEDIA AND THE IMPROPER USE OF ALGORITHMS:
(I) APPROPRIATIONS FROM THE FUND IN THE STATE BUDGET
SHALL BE MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE ALLOCATION AND DISTRIBUTION OF
FUNDS TO THE STATE AND ITS POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS AS AGREED ON IN ANY
STATE–SUBDIVISION AGREEMENT, AS AMENDED; AND
(II) THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH SHALL ESTABLISH AND
ADMINISTER A GRANT PROGRAM FOR THE DISTRIBUTION OF FUNDS TO POLITICAL
SUBDIVISIONS OF THE STATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH ANY STATE–SUBDIVISION
AGREEMENT, AS AMENDED.
(3) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL IDENTIFY AND DESIGNATE THE
CONTROLLING VERSION OF AN AGREEMENT OR AMENDMENT DESCRIBED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(J) (1) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR THE PROGRAMS AND
SERVICES DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION IS SUPPLEMENTAL
TO AND IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE
WOULD BE APPROPRIATED FOR THE PROGRAMS AND SERVICES.
(2) EXCEPT AS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION,
MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND MAY NOT BE USED FOR ADMINISTRATIVE
EXPENSES.
(K) THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP KEY GOALS, KEY OBJECTIVES, AND KEY PERFORMANCE
INDICATORS RELATING TO ALGORITHMIC ADDICTION TREATMENT AND
PREVENTION EFFORTS;
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (H)(2) OF THIS SECTION, AT LEAST
ONCE EACH YEAR, CONSULT WITH ALGORITHMIC ADDICTION TREATMENT AND
PREVENTION STAKEHOLDERS, INCLUDING CONSUMERS, PROVIDERS, FAMILIES,

SENATE BILL 602 5
AND ADVOCATES, TO IDENTIFY RECOMMENDED APPROPRIATIONS FROM THE FUND;
AND
(3) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, REPORT TO THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, ON:
(I) AN ACCOUNTING OF TOTAL FUNDS EXPENDED FROM THE
FUND IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR BY:
1. USE;
2. IF APPLICABLE, JURISDICTION; AND
3. BUDGET PROGRAM AND SUBDIVISION;
(II) THE PERFORMANCE INDICATORS AND PROGRESS TOWARD
ACHIEVING THE GOALS AND OBJECTIVES DEVELOPED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION; AND
(III) THE RECOMMENDED APPROPRIATIONS FROM THE FUND
IDENTIFIED IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Section 1 of this Act shall take effect contingent on a judgment by a federal or
State court against or settlement with technology conglomerates, technology companies,
social media conglomerates, or social media companies relating to any claims made or
prosecuted by the State to recover damages for violations of State law.
(b) Within 5 days after a judgment or settlement described in subsection (a) of
this section is awarded or approved, the Attorney General shall notify the Department of
Legislative Services.
(c) Section 1 of this Act shall take effect on the date the notice is received by the
Department of Legislative Services in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 2 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2026.